src-fst-affixes-digits.lexc.md
Digit strings inflect with colons, lot like abbreviations.

The digit strings ending in digit 1 pronounced as number

* examples:*
* *1:* `1+Num+Card+Sg+Nom`
* *1:t:* `1+Num+Card+Pl+Nom`
* *1:ssä:* `1+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`

The digit strings ending in digit 2 pronounced as number
* *2:*
* *2:t:*
* *2:ssa:*

The digit strings ending in digit 3 pronounced as number
* *3:*
* *3:t:*
* *3:ssa:*

The digit strings ending in digit 4 pronounced as number
* *4:*
* *4:t:*
* *4:ssä:*

The digit strings ending in digit 5 pronounced as number
* *5:*
* *5:t:*
* *5:ssä:*

The digit strings ending in digit 6 pronounced as number
* *6:*
* *6:t:*
* *6:ss:*

The digit strings ending in digit 7 pronounced as number
* *7:*
* *7:t:*
* *7:ssä:*

The digit strings ending in digit 8 pronounced as number
* *8:*
* *8:t:*
* *8:ssa:*


The digit strings ending in digit 9 pronounced as number
* *9:*
* *9:t:*
* *9:ssä:*

The digit strings ending in digit 0 pronounced as number
* *0:*
* *0:t:*
* *0:aa:*

The digit string ending in 0 pronounced as tens
* *10:*
* *10:t:*
* *10:tä:*

The digit string ending in 00 pronounced as hundreds
* *100:*
* *100:t:*
* *100:aa:*

The digit string ending in 000 pronounced as thousands
* *1000:*
* *1000:t:*
* *1000:ta:*

The digit string ending in 0's pronounced as millions
* *1000000:*
* *1000000:t:*
* *1000000:aa:*

The digit string ending in 0's pronounced as milliards
* *1000000000:*
* *1000000000:t:*
* *1000000000:a:*

The digit string ending in 1. pronounced as first
* *1.:*
* *1:nen:*
* *1:stä:*

The digit string ending in 2. pronounced as second
* *2.:*
* *2:nen:*
* *2:sta:*

The digit string ending in 3, 6, 8, 00 or 2 pronounced as ordinal
* *3.:*
* *3:s:*
* *3:tta:*

The digit string ending in 4, 5, 7, 9, 0, or 1. pronounced as ordinal
* *4.:*
* *4:s:*
* *4:ttä:*

The roman digit string ending in II, III, VI, VIII, C, L or M
* *II:*
* *II:ta:*

The roman digit string ending in I, IV, V, VII, IX, X or 
* *I:*
* *I:tä:*

* *1:nsä:*

* *2:nsa:*

* *3:aan:*

* *2:kseen:*

* *1:kseen:*

* *5:ttään:*

* *2:han:*

* *4:hän:*







































































































































































































































































































































































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/digits.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/digits.lexc)</small>
